tests/ky-numbers.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kir.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kir.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[lexc] collective numerals":
    1<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : 1-өөсү
    2<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : 2-өөсү
    3<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : 3-өөсү
    4<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : 4-өөсү
    5<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : 5-өөсү
    6<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : 6-оосу
    7<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : 7-өөсү
    1<num><coll><subst><nom> : 1-өө
    2<num><coll><subst><nom> : 2-өө
    3<num><coll><subst><nom> : 3-өө
    4<num><coll><subst><nom> : 4-өө
    5<num><coll><subst><nom> : 5-өө
    6<num><coll><subst><nom> : 6-оо
    7<num><coll><subst><nom> : 7-өө


  "[lexc] adverbial collective numerals":
    1<num><coll><advl> : 1-өө
    2<num><coll><advl> : 2-өө
    3<num><coll><advl> : 3-өө
    4<num><coll><advl> : 4-өө
    5<num><coll><advl> : 5-өө
    6<num><coll><advl> : 6-оо
    7<num><coll><advl> : 7-өө
    1<num><coll><subst><nom> : 1-өө
    2<num><coll><subst><nom> : 2-өө
    3<num><coll><subst><nom> : 3-өө
    4<num><coll><subst><nom> : 4-өө
    5<num><coll><subst><nom> : 5-өө
    6<num><coll><subst><nom> : 6-оо
    7<num><coll><subst><nom> : 7-өө


  "[lexc] collective numbers":
    бир<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : бирөөсү
    эки<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : экөөсү
    үч<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : үчөөсү
    төрт<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : төртөөсү
    беш<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : бешөөсү
    алты<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : алтоосу
    жети<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom> : жетөөсү
